Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20252-1826
Acts; how designated; termination.

This section terminates on July 1, 2026. The Nebraska Potato Development Act and the Nebraska Potato Inspection Act shall become one act in two parts with the Nebraska Potato Development Act designated as Part I and the Nebraska Potato Inspection Act designated as Part II thereof and the Revisor of Statutes shall make appropriate changes in the statutes necessitated by such redesignation.

Laws 1969, c. 20, § 18, p. 192;

Laws 1987, LB 20, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 3.

Nebraska Potato Development Act, see section 2-1801.

Nebraska Potato Inspection Act, see section 2-1813.